District of Columbia statutes.
4-702.01

Repealed

Emergency Shelter and Support Services Program established.

Repealed.

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-146, § 3a
as added Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-197, § 2(c), 37 DCR 4815
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-192, § 2, 43 DCR 4285
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 702, 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 6, 46 DCR 905
Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 116(c), 48 DCR 7674
Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 32(b), 52 DCR 8113
1981 Ed., § 3-602.1.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Emergency Assistance Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-24, July 14, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 3830).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of General Public Assistance Program Termination Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-21, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5760).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 702 of Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 6 of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 16(c) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-51, October 30, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 10807).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-36, April 11, 1995, 42 DCR 1839), § 2 of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-105, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4019), § 2 of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-425, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6141), § 2 of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-485, January 2, 1997, 44 DCR 630), and § 2 of the Emergency Assistance Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-42, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2091).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3 of the General Public Assistance Program Termination Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-72, May 12, 1997, 44 DCR 2989).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 702 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196) and § 702 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 6 of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 6 of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682), § 6 of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 6 of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(c) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-55, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4390).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(c) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-101, July 23, 2001, 48 DCR 7123).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 116(c) of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).
Application of Law 12-60: Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.